Maine, session 132, LD386.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §3301-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 190, §1, is amended
to read:
1. Sharing information. Nothing in this This Part precludes does not preclude a law
enforcement officer or criminal justice agency from sharing information with a school
superintendent or principal, whether or not the information is contained in records,
pertaining to a juvenile when the information is credible and indicates a substantial danger
with the use of a firearm as defined in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 12-A or dangerous
weapon as defined in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 9 or an imminent danger to the safety
of students or school personnel on school grounds or at a school function. The
superintendent or principal may disseminate this information only to the extent necessary
to protect students and school personnel and as governed by subsection 2.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1055, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2019, c. 525, §35, is
further amended to read:
11. Notification teams. Within 10 days after receiving notice from a district attorney
of an alleged juvenile offense or juvenile offense, pursuant to Title 15, section 3308‑B,
subsection 1 or after receiving notice from a law enforcement officer of credible
information that indicates an imminent danger to regarding the safety of students or school
personnel pursuant to Title 15, section 3301‑A, the superintendent shall convene a
notification team. The notification team must consist of the administrator of the school
building or the administrator's designee, at least one classroom teacher to whom the student
is assigned, a parent or guardian of the student and a guidance counselor. The notification
team is entitled to receive the information described in Title 15, section 3308‑B, subsection
1, paragraphs A to F and in Title 15, section 3301‑A. The notification team shall also
determine on the basis of need which school employees are entitled to receive that
information.
Confidentiality of this criminal justice information regarding juveniles must be ensured at
all times, and the information may be released only under the conditions of this subsection.
Page 1 - 132LR1041(03)

The superintendent shall ensure that confidentiality training is provided to all school
employees who have access to the information.
Page 2 - 132LR1041(03)